Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-151
Interstate compact; requirements.

A compact entered into pursuant to sections 43-147 to 43-154 shall include:

(1) A provision making it available for joinder by all states;

(2) A provision for withdrawal from the compact upon written notice to the parties, but with a period of one year between the date of the notice and the effective date of the withdrawal;

(3) A requirement that the protection afforded by or pursuant to the compact continue in force for the duration of the adoption assistance and be applicable to all children and their adoptive parents who on the effective date of the withdrawal are receiving adoption assistance from a party state other than the one in which they are residents and have their principal place of abode;

(4) A requirement that each instance of adoption assistance to which the compact applies be covered by an adoption assistance agreement in writing between the adoptive parents and the state child welfare agency of the state which undertakes to provide the adoption assistance and that any such agreement be expressly for the benefit of the adopted child and enforceable by the adoptive parents and the state agency providing the adoption assistance; and

(5) Such other provisions as may be appropriate to implement the proper administration of the compact.

Laws 1985, LB 447, § 5.